Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Transfer of Ownership and Refunds

§ 321.
Procedure upon transfer.

Upon the transfer of ownership of any registered motor vehicle, its registration shall expire. The person in whose name the transferred vehicle was registered shall immediately return to the Commissioner the registration certificate assigned to the transferred vehicle, with the date of transfer and the name and residence of the new owner endorsed on the back. However, the Commissioner may accept any other satisfactory evidence of the date of transfer and new ownership. The transferor shall immediately remove the registration number plates from the transferred vehicle and may attach the registration number plates to another unregistered motor vehicle owned by him or her and the owner or operator shall not, for a period of 60 days, be subject to a civil penalty for the operation of the latter motor vehicle without the proper registration certificate, provided he or she has, within 24 hours of the transfer, made application, as provided in section 323 of this title, for transfer of the registration number plates. If such application for transfer is not so received by the Commissioner, the number plates shall be returned to the Commissioner at the end of five days after the transfer of ownership.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 68

, § 1, eff. April 18, 1975;

1987, No. 112

, § 8;

2017, No. 71

, § 6;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 145.

§ 322.
Failure to return certificate upon sale of vehicle.

Except as provided in section 321 of this title, a person shall return to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles the registration certificate and number plates of any motor vehicle when the vehicle is sold or exchanged by the person, together with the notice of the sale, when required by this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1987, No. 112

, § 9.

§ 323.
Transfer fees.

A person who transfers the ownership of a registered motor vehicle to another, upon the filing of a new application and upon the payment of a fee of $25.00, may have registered in his or her name another motor vehicle for the remainder of the registration period without payment of any additional registration fee, provided the proper registration fee of the motor vehicle sought to be registered is the same as the registration fee of the transferred motor vehicle. However, if the proper registration fee of the motor vehicle sought to be registered by such person is greater than the registration fee of the transferred motor vehicle, the applicant shall pay, in addition to such fee of $25.00, the difference between the registration fee of the motor vehicle previously registered and the proper fee for the registration of the motor vehicle sought to be registered.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1975, No. 90

, § 2;

1979, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, Pt. IV, eff. Sept. 1, 1980;

1989, No. 51

, § 15;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 15, 2002;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2009, No. 50

, § 40;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 324.
Use of old number plates.

When ownership of a motor vehicle is transferred, the transferer may attach the registration number plates to another motor vehicle owned by him or her and register the same in accordance with the provisions of sections 321, 323, and 325 of this title only if such transferred vehicle and such other vehicle are both of the pleasure car type, both motor trucks or tractors, both motor buses, or both motorcycles, except that a pleasure car registration and a truck registration shall be mutually transferable on payment of the difference in registration fees.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 120

, § 3;

1975, No. 55

.

§ 325.
Refund of part of old registration fee.

If the registration fee of the motor vehicle sought to be registered is less than the registration fee of the transferred motor vehicle, the Commissioner shall certify to the Commissioner of Finance and Management the facts pertinent to the difference of such registration fees, giving the name of the owner of such motor vehicle, his or her address, the amount of the original registration fee paid, the date of application for transfer, and the correct fee for the motor vehicle sought to be registered.
The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue his or her warrant in favor of the owner for such percent of the difference in registration fees as the unexpired term bears to the entire registration period, but if a transfer of registration is made before the 15th day of any month, the transfer, for the purpose of the refund, shall be considered as having been made on the first day of such month.
If such transfer of registration is made on or after the 15th day of any month, the transfer, for the purpose of the refund, shall be considered as having been made on the first day of the month following such application for transfer.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 85

, § 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1977;

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b).

§ 326.
Refund upon loss of vehicle.

The Commissioner may cancel the registration of a motor vehicle when the owner thereof proves to his or her satisfaction that it has been totally destroyed by fire or, through crash or wear, has become wholly unfit for use and has been dismantled. After the Commissioner cancels the registration and the owner returns to the Commissioner either the registration certificate, or the number plates and the validation sticker, the Commissioner shall certify to the Commissioner of Finance and Management the fact of the cancellation, giving the name of the owner of the motor vehicle, his or her address, the amount of the registration fee paid, and the date of cancellation. The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue his or her warrant in favor of the owner for such percent of the registration fee paid as the unexpired term of the registration bears to the entire registration period, but in no case shall the Commissioner retain less than $5.00 of the fee paid.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 129

, § 4;

1975, No. 90

, § 3;

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b);

2017, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 327.
Refund when plates not used.

Subject to the conditions set forth in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this section, the Commissioner may cancel the registration of a motor vehicle, snowmobile, or motorboat when the owner returns to the Commissioner either the number plates, if any, or the registration certificate. Upon cancellation of the registration, the Commissioner shall notify the Commissioner of Finance and Management, who shall issue a refund as follows:

For registrations cancelled prior to the beginning of the registration period, the refund is the full amount of the fee paid, less a charge of $5.00.

For registrations cancelled within 30 days of the date of issue, the refund is the full amount of the fee paid, less a charge of $5.00. The owner of a motor vehicle must prove to the Commissioner’s satisfaction that the number plates have not been used or attached to a motor vehicle.

For registrations cancelled prior to the beginning of the second year of a two-year registration period, the refund is one-half of the full amount of the two-year fee paid, less a charge of $5.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 129

, § 5;

1969, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1987, No. 112

, § 6;

2001, No. 75

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 59;

2017, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 328.
Repealed. 2015, No. 47, § 8.

§ 329.
Refunds paid from motor vehicle fees.

The refunds mentioned in sections 325-327 of this title shall be paid from the fees turned into the State Treasury by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

HISTORY:

Amended

2015, No. 47

, § 10.

§ 330.
Transferring number plates.

Upon the transfer of ownership of a vehicle, the registration number plates may be attached to another vehicle that is being leased by the registrant for a period greater than 30 days. The lessor shall become the registrant.

Upon the termination of a lease of a vehicle, the registration number plates may be attached to another vehicle being leased by the lessee. The lessor of the new vehicle shall become the registrant.

Upon the termination of a lease of a vehicle, the registration number plates may be attached to a vehicle, including the leased vehicle, being purchased or owned by the lessee. The lessor shall be deleted from the registration.

For purposes of calculating fees, transactions pursuant to subsections (a) and (c) of this section shall be considered to be new registrations. Transactions pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be treated as registration transfers. A lessor shall not gain any rights in or to special number plates or reserved registration numbers through this process nor shall the prohibitions of subdivision 304(c)(3) of this title apply.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 10, 1996.